Tennessee, session 114, SB1118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-7-113(a)(2), is amended by
adding "law schools, veterinary schools," immediately after "medical schools,".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-7-113(b), is amended by deleting
"sixty-five (65) years of age" and substituting instead "sixty-two (62) years of age".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to the 2025-2026 academic year and each academic year thereafter.
SB1118
002631
- 1 -